New Jersey, session 221, S2937.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1. a.  The Office of Diversity, Equity, Inclusion, and Belonging established in the Office of the Governor pursuant to Executive Order No. 265 of 2021, in undertaking the duties of this office with regard to policies concerning diversity, equity, inclusion, and belonging, shall ensure that all State agencies, personnel, and recipients of State funds incorporate the following in their respective policies: (1)  the working definition of Antisemitism adopted on May 26, 2016 by the International Holocaust Remembrance Alliance (IHRA), 1[and] which states that antisemitism is a certain perception of Jews, which may be expressed as hatred toward Jews. Rhetorical and physical manifestations of antisemitism are directed toward Jewish or non-Jewish individuals and/or their property, toward Jewish community institutions and religious facilities. The definition shall include1 the Contemporary Examples of Antisemitism identified by the IHRA, to the extent the examples are useful for this purpose; and (2)  the working definition of Islamophobia adopted by the United Nations (UN), 1[and] which states that islamophobia is a fear, prejudice and hatred of Muslims that leads to provocation, hostility and intolerance by means of threatening, harassment, abuse, incitement and intimidation of Muslims and non-Muslims, both in the online and offline world. Motivated by institutional, ideological, political and religious hostility that transcends into structural and cultural racism, it targets the symbols and markers of being a Muslim. The definition shall include1 any examples and guidelines identified by the UN, to the extent the examples and guidelines are useful for this purpose. b.  The requirements of subsection a. of this section concerning the incorporation of working definitions of Antisemitism and Islamophobia in diversity, equity, inclusion, and belonging policies, shall be applicable to all such policies issued by State agencies and recipients of State funds. 2.  This act shall take effect immediately.